apertium-hin.hin.dix
    <pardef n="जा__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेंगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएँगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेंगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएगा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेंगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएँगे</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जायेंगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाएँगी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाला</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाले</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाली</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानेवाली</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाना</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जानी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाने</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाऊँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जायें</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जायें</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाये</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाय</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जायें</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाएँ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाइये</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाइए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जा</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाओ</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाता</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जातें</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाते</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाती</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जातीं</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>जाकर</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>जाके</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गया</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>गये</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गए</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>गयी</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गई</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>गयीं</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>गईं</l><r>जा<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->       
    <pardef n="ऐस__det">
      <e>       <p><l>ा</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>े</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दोनों__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दूसरी__det">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="कई__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="एक__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="मेरी__det">	
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 
            

    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->      

    <pardef n="ने__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="/का__post">
       <e><p><l>का</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>के</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>की</l><r>का<s n="post"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTIN: Pronouns -->

    <e lm="बकौल"><i>बकौल</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ज़रीए"><i>ज़रीए</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="हेतु"><i>हेतु</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="सिवाय"><i>सिवाय</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="पे"><i>पे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="आगे"><i>आगे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="की ओर"><i>की<b/>ओर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="साथ"><i>साथ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="समेत"><i>समेत</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="बिना"><i>बिना</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="अलावा"><i>अलावा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="बतौर"><i>बतौर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i></i><par n="/का__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ने" ><i>ने</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="में" ><i>में</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="मे" ><i>मे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पर"><i>पर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लिए"><i>लिए</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="लिये"><i>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के उपर"><i>के<b/>उपर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के विरुद्ध"><i>के<b/>विरुद्ध</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के विरूद्ध"><i>के<b/>विरूद्ध</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के खिलाफ"><i>के<b/>खिलाफ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के खिलाफ"><i>के<b/>खिलाफ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के अन्तर्गत"><i>के<b/>अन्तर्गत</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के तौर पर"><i>के<b/>तौर<b/>पर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="तौर पर"><i>तौर<b/>पर</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के तहत"><i>के<b/>तहत</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के बाद"><i>के<b/>बाद</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="तहत"><i>तहत</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="से"><i>से</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="द्वारा"><i>द्वारा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुसार"><i>अनुसार</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="मुताबिक़"><i>मुताबिक़</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="सहित"><i>सहित</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="दौरान"><i>दौरान</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="बारे"><i>बारे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिये"><i>के<b/>लिये</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के लिए"><i>के<b/>लिए</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के द्वारा"><i>के<b/>द्वारा</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के सामने"><i>के<b/>सामने</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के नीचे"><i>के<b/>नीचे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पीछे"><i>के<b/>पीछे</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पश्चात"><i>के<b/>पश्चात</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पश्चात्"><i>के<b/>पश्चात्</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के साथ"><i>के<b/>साथ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के साथ-साथ"><i>के<b/>साथ-साथ</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के पास"><i>के<b/>पास</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के आसपास"><i>के<b/>आसपास</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के मुताबिक़"><i>के<b/>मुताबिक़</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के मुताबिक"><i>के<b/>मुताबिक</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="के अनुसार"><i>के<b/>अनुसार</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के समय"><i>के<b/>समय</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के दौरान"><i>के<b/>दौरान</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के कारन"><i>के<b/>कारन</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="के समक्ष"><i>के<b/>समक्ष</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="ऑन"><i>ऑन</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
	<e lm="खिलाफ़"><i>खिलाफ़</i><par n="ने__post"/></e>
    <e lm="दोनों"><i>दोनों</i><par n="दोनों__det"/></e>
    <e lm="दूसरी"><i>दूसरी</i><par n="दूसरी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जैस"><i>जैस</i><par n="ऐस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कैस"><i>कैस</i><par n="ऐस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐसा"><i>ऐस</i><par n="ऐस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐस"><i>ऐस</i><par n="ऐस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="वैस"><i>वैस</i><par n="ऐस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कई__det"/></e>
	<e lm="बनवाया जा"><i>बनवाया<b/>जा</i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="कहा जा"><i>कहा<b/></i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="जा"><i></i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हो जा"><i>हो<b/></i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="हो जा"><i>हो</i><par n="जा__vblex_iv"/></e>
